Utah statutes.
17B-1-1201.   Definitions.

As used in this part:

(1)  "Eligible function" means:

(a)  a power conferred on a local district under this title;

(b)  a tax or assessment levied by a local district;

(c)  an act or proceeding that a local district:

(i)  has taken; or

(ii)  contemplates taking; or

(d)  a district contract, whether already executed or to be executed in the future, including a contract for the acquisition, construction, maintenance, or operation of works for the district.

(2)  "Validation order" means a court order adjudicating the validity of an eligible function.

(3)  "Validation petition" means a petition requesting a validation order.

(4)  "Validation proceedings" means judicial proceedings occurring in district court pursuant to a validation petition.



Enacted by Chapter 329, 2007 General Session

